District of Columbia statutes.
50-2201.03

Mayor to make rules; Department of Transportation; Director; Congressional and Council parking; title fees; common carriers; penalties; prosecutions; publication of regulations; excise tax; impoundment for outstanding violations.

(a)

The Mayor is authorized and empowered to make, modify, repeal, and enforce rules relating to and concerning the following:

(1)

The control of traffic and the movement of traffic;

(2)

(A)

The length, weight, height, and width of vehicles; and

(B)

The brakes, horns, lights, mufflers, and other equipment of vehicles and the inspection of same;

(3)

(A)

The registration and reregistration of vehicles;

(B)

The titling and retitling of motor vehicles and trailers, and the transfer of titles to motor vehicles and trailers; and

(C)

The revocation, suspension, restoration, and reinstatement of the registration for motor vehicles and trailers and of certificates of title to motor vehicles and trailers;

(4)

The issuance, suspension, revocation, restoration, and reinstatement of operator’s permits and operating privileges; provided, that the fee for restoration or reinstatement shall be $98;

(5)

The establishment and location of hack stands; and

(6)

The speed, routing, and parking of vehicles; provided, that the Mayor shall establish and locate parking areas in the vicinity of government establishments for use only by members of Congress and governmental officials when on official business.

(b)

There is established in the government of the District of Columbia a Department of Transportation, which under the direction of the Mayor, shall have charge of the issuance and revocation of operators’ permits, the registration and titling of motor vehicles, the making of traffic studies and plans, the establishment and designation of arterial and other public highways, providing for the equipment of any street, road, or highway with control lights or other devices, or both, for the regulation of traffic, the installation and maintenance of traffic signs, signals, and markers, and of such other matters as may be determined by the Mayor. The Mayor shall appoint a Director of Vehicles and Traffic, who shall be in charge of said Department, and such other personnel as he or she may deem necessary to perform the duties thereof and as may be appropriated for by Congress. The Director of Vehicles and Traffic shall be responsible directly to the Mayor for the faithful performance of his or her duties and shall be subject to removal by the Mayor for cause.

(c)

Members of Congress or the Council may park their vehicles in any available curb space in the District of Columbia, when:

(1)

The vehicle is used by the member of Congress or the Council on official business;

(2)

The vehicle is displaying a Congressional or Council registration tag or parking placard issued for the current session or by the District; and

(3)

The vehicle is not parked in violation of a loading zone, rush hour, firehouse, or fire plug limitation.

(d)

The Mayor shall cause to be levied, collected, and paid a $26 fee for each titling, duplicate titling, and retitling, and he or she shall not, after the 1st day of January, 1932, register or renew the registration of any motor vehicle or trailer unless and until the owner thereof shall make application in the form prescribed by the Mayor and be granted an official certificate of title for such vehicle. No registration or titling fee shall be charged for vehicles owned by the District government. The owner of a motor vehicle or trailer registered in the District of Columbia shall not, after the 1st day of January, 1932, operate or permit or cause to be operated any such vehicle upon any public highway in the District without first obtaining a certificate of title therefor, nor shall any individual knowingly permit any certificate of title to be obtained in his or her name for any vehicle not in fact owned by him or her, and any individual violating any provision of this subsection or any regulations promulgated thereunder shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned not more than one year, or both. If the properly designated agent of the Mayor shall determine that an applicant for a certificate of title is not entitled thereto, such certificate of title may be refused, and in that event unless such determination is reversed upon written application to the Mayor by the individual affected, such individual shall be entitled to proceed further as provided under § 50-1403.01(a); provided, that reasonable time for hearing be given the applicant in the first instance.

(e)

As to all common carriers by vehicle which enter, operate in, or leave the District of Columbia, the power to route small vehicles within the District of Columbia, to regulate their equipment other than that specifically named elsewhere in this part, to regulate their schedules and their loading and unloading, to locate their stops and all platforms and loading zones, and to require the appropriate marking thereof is vested in the Public Service Commission of the District of Columbia.

(f)

Except as otherwise provided in this part or in the District of Columbia Traffic Adjudication Act of 1978 (§ 50-2301.01 et seq.), any person violating any provision of this part or any rule promulgated hereunder shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned for not more than 90 days, or both. Prosecution for violations shall be in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia upon information or indictment filed by the Corporation Counsel of the District of Columbia or any of his or her assistants.

(g)

All regulations promulgated under the authority of this part shall be published in accordance with the requirements of subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.].

(h)

Repealed.

(i)

Repealed.

(j)

(1)

In addition to the fees and charges levied under other provisions of this part, there is levied and imposed an excise tax on the issuance of every original certificate of title for a motor vehicle or trailer in the District of Columbia and every subsequent certificate of title issued in the District of Columbia in the case of a sale, resale, or gift, except in the case of a bona fide gift of a vehicle already titled in the District given between spouses, parent and child, or domestic partners, as that term is defined in § 32-701(3), or other transfer at the following percentage of the fair market value of the motor vehicle or trailer at the time the certificate of title is issued:

Weight Class Registration Fee

Class I (3,499 pounds or less) 6%

Class II (3,500 — 4,999 pounds) 7%

Class III (5,000 pounds or greater) 8%.

(2)

For the purpose of this section, the Mayor or his or her duly authorized representative shall determine the fair market value of a motor vehicle or trailer. As used in this section, the term “original certificate of title” shall mean the first certificate of title issued by the District of Columbia for any particular motor vehicle or trailer. No certificate of title so issued shall be delivered or furnished to the person entitled thereto until the tax has been paid in full. The Assessor of the District of Columbia may require every applicant for a certificate to title to supply such information as he or she deems necessary as to the time of purchase, the purchase price, and other information relative to the determination of the fair market value of any motor vehicle or trailer for which a certificate of title is required and issued.

(3)

The issuance of certificates of title for the following motor vehicles and trailers shall be exempt from the tax imposed by this subsection:

(A)

Motor vehicles and trailers owned by the United States or the District of Columbia;

(B)

Repealed;

(C)

Repealed;

(D)

Motor vehicles and trailers owned by a utility or public service company for use in furnishing a commodity or service; provided, that the receipts from furnishing such commodity or service are subject to a gross receipts or mileage tax in force in the District of Columbia at the time of a certificate of title for any such vehicle or trailer is issued.

(E)

New motor vehicles acquired from dealers as replacements for defective vehicles purchased new not more than 60 days prior to the date of such replacement, except that if the fair market value of any replacement vehicle is greater than that of the vehicle which it replaces, then the tax imposed by this section shall be paid on such difference in value. If the fair market value of any replacement vehicle is less than that of the vehicle which it replaces, then the Mayor or his or her designated agent is authorized to refund to the owner of the replacement vehicle an amount equal to the difference between the excise tax paid on the defective vehicle and the excise tax paid on the replacement vehicle.

(F)

Rental or leased motor vehicles or trailers; provided, that the rental or leasing of such vehicles is subject to the gross receipts tax described in § 47-2002(3)(C).

(G)

Taxis or taxicabs as defined in § 50-303(8).

(H)

Motor vehicles and trailers registered or titled in another state or United States jurisdiction by a nonresident before the nonresident established or maintained residency in the District.

(I)

Commercial vehicles having the characteristics specified [in] § 47-2352(c) that are owned or leased by a company with an established place of business (as defined in § 47-2302(13)) located within the District of Columbia, if such vehicles are used to furnish a commodity or service; provided, that, the receipts from furnishing such commodity or service are subject to a gross receipts or mileage tax in force in the District of Columbia at the time a certificate of title is issued for the vehicle.

(J)

Motor vehicles, excluding motorcycles and motor-driven cycles, with an estimated average miles per gallon (“MPG”) for city driving at or above 40 MPG, as determined in accordance with 40 CFR § 600.001-08, and published in the Fuel Economy Guide by the United States Environmental Protection Agency and the United States Department of Energy or other alternative fueled vehicles as determined by the Department of Motor Vehicles through rulemaking.

(K)

Motor vehicles following the death of one co-owner; provided, that the title is issued to a surviving owner.

(L)

Motor vehicles whose ownership is determined by a decree of divorce or separation or pursuant to a written instrument incident to such divorce or separation; or, in the case of former domestic partners, ownership is either determined by a court order or one co-owner transfers his or her interest to the other co-owner provided that the applicant also submits the termination statement provided for in § 32-702(d)(1); and

(M)

Motor vehicles re-titled by an insurance company in connection with an insurance claim or pursuant to Chapter 13A of this title.

(N)

Any vehicle for which the certificate of title issued is a scrap title issued pursuant to § 50-2705.

(O)

Repealed.

(P)

Vehicles for which a District of Columbia title is being issued to the lienholder because of repossession or was re-issued to the owner after repossession.

(Q)

Vehicles designated as non-repairable or salvage pursuant to Chapter 13A of this title [§ 50-1331.01 et seq.].

(k)

(1)

Any unattended motor vehicle found parked at any time upon any public highway of the District of Columbia against which there are 2 or more unpaid notices of infraction or vehicle conveyance fees that the owner was deemed to have admitted or that were sustained after a hearing, pursuant to § 50-2303.05, § 50-2303.06, or § 50-2209.02, or against which there have been issued 2 or more warrants may, by or under the direction of a law enforcement officer or member of the Metropolitan Police force or the United States Park Police force or an employee of the District of Columbia Department of Transportation, either by towing or otherwise, be removed or conveyed to and impounded in any place designated by the Mayor or immobilized in such manner as to prevent its operation; except, that no such vehicle shall be immobilized by any means other than by the use of a device or other mechanism which will cause no damage to such vehicle unless it is moved while such device or mechanism is in place.

(2)

The notice, reclamation, and disposition procedures set forth in §§ 50-2421.06 through 50-2421.10, shall apply to any vehicle impounded pursuant to this section. In any case involving immobilization of a vehicle pursuant to this subsection, such member or law enforcement officer or employee shall cause to be placed on such vehicle, in a conspicuous manner, notice sufficient to warn any individual to the effect that such vehicle has been immobilized and that any attempt to move such vehicle might result in damage to such vehicle.

(3)

Repealed.

(4)

The owner of an immobilized vehicle shall be subject to a booting fee of $75 for such immobilization.

(5)

Before the removal of an immobilization mechanism on a motor vehicle or the release of a motor vehicle from impoundment, the owner shall pay all outstanding fees, charges, civil fines, or penalties incurred pursuant to this section and §§ 50-1401.01, 50-1401.02, 31-2413(b)(2)(A), 50-1101, 50-1106, 50-1501.02, 50-1501.03, 50-2301.05, 50-2303.04a, and 50-2421.09(a), against the owner or any motor vehicle in which the owner has an ownership interest or had an ownership interest when a notice of infraction was issued.

(l)

The Director of the Department of Motor Vehicles may establish a fee discount of up to 10% on any service obtained through the telephone, Internet, mail, or other method that does not involve an in-person visit to the Department. This subsection shall not apply to the payment of the motor vehicle title tax.

Mar. 3, 1925, 43 Stat. 1121, ch. 443, § 6
July 3, 1926, 44 Stat. 814, ch. 739, § 4
Feb. 27, 1931, 46 Stat. 1424, ch. 317, §§ 3, 4
Dec. 19, 1932, 47 Stat. 750, ch. 5
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 2, 1945, 59 Stat. 313, ch. 222
May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 128, title III, ch. 146, § 301
Oct. 28, 1949, 63 Stat. 972, title XI, ch. 782, § 1106(a)
July 24, 1956, 70 Stat. 633, ch. 695, § 1
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 598, Pub. L. 85-273, § 3
Oct. 3, 1962, 76 Stat. 742, Pub. L. 87-745, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 634, Pub. L. 88-503, § 21
Sept. 30, 1966, 80 Stat. 856, Pub. L. 89-610, title II, § 201
1967 Reorg. Plan No. 3, 81 Stat. 980, § 503(c)
Dec. 4, 1967, 81 Stat. 532, Pub. L. 90-172, § 1
Oct. 31, 1969, 83 Stat. 172, 174, Pub. L. 91-106, §§ 201, 404
Dec. 12, 1969, 83 Stat. 343, Pub. L. 91-145, § 101
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, 583, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, §§ 155(a), 163(g)(2)
Dec. 15, 1971, 85 Stat. 657, Pub. L. 92-196, title VII, § 705
Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 1015, Pub. L. 92-518, title III, § 301(a)
Nov. 1, 1973, 87 Stat. 531, Pub. L. 93-145, § 101
Oct. 21, 1975, D.C. Law 1-23, title I, § 102, 22 DCR 2094
Jan. 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-42, § 7(b), 22 DCR 6317
June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-70, title II, § 201, 23 DCR 536
Apr. 19, 1977, D.C. Law 1-124, title I, § 102, 23 DCR 8749
Apr. 26, 1977, D.C. Law 1-133, title IV, § 402, 23 DCR 9697
Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-104, §§ 501, 601, 25 DCR 1275
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(l), 25 DCR 5740
Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-157, § 5, 25 DCR 6995
Apr. 3, 1982, D.C. Law 4-97, § 5, 29 DCR 765
Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-145, § 7, 29 DCR 3138
June 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-14, §§ 803, 804, 30 DCR 2632
Nov. 15, 1983, D.C. Law 5-42, § 2(b), 30 DCR 4999
May 1, 1990, D.C. Law 8-103, § 2, 37 DCR 1615
Sept. 26, 1990, D.C. Law 8-170, § 2, 37 DCR 4839
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-30, § 4(a), 38 DCR 4215
May 5, 1992, D.C. Law 9-96, § 4(b), 38 DCR 7274
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 802, 45 DCR 7193
April 5, 2000, D.C. Law 13-80, § 2, 46 DCR 10463
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 34, 49 DCR 8140
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 1706(a), 49 DCR 11664
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-35, § 13(b), 50 DCR 6579
Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-239, § 2(a), 51 DCR 9600
Apr. 8, 2005, D.C. Law 15-307, § 402, 52 DCR 1700
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 6002, 52 DCR 7503
June 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-129, § 2, 53 DCR 4716
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-139, § 10, 53 DCR 3682
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 89, 53 DCR 6794
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-279, §§ 202(a), 401(a), 54 DCR 903
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 6006, 55 DCR 7598
Sept. 12, 2008, D.C. Law 17-231, § 42, 55 DCR 6758
Mar. 20, 2009, D.C. Law 17-303, § 3(b), 55 DCR 12803
Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-272, § 2, 60 DCR 1729
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 102(b), 59 DCR 12957
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-290, § 5(a), 60 DCR 2343
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 271(a), 60 DCR 2064
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, §§ 6012, 6133, 60 DCR 12472
Alcoholic beverage control, operation of trains, streetcars, and other vehicles by intoxicated persons, see § 25-1009.
General license law, vehicles hauling goods from public space, hack stands, see § 47-2831.
Motor vehicle exhaust emissions inspections, see § 50-1101 et seq.
National Capital Region Transportation, revenues allocated to the Metrorail/Metrobus Account, see § 9-1111.15.
Parks and playgrounds, regulation of vehicles and traffic, see § 10-105.
Public roads and bridges, jurisdiction and control, see § 9-101.02.
Public roads, designation of “business streets” for parking and sidewalk purposes, see § 9-1201.05.
Public Service Commission, promulgated rules and regulations, prosecution for violations, see § 34-731.
Public Service Commission, suspension of powers by the Compact for Mass Transportation, see § 9-1103.04.
Public utilities, regulation and enforcement, powers and duties of the Mayor, see § 34-809.
Registration of motor vehicles, issuance and expiration of registration documents, see § 50-1501.02.
Regulations necessary for the protection of lives, limbs, health, comfort, and quiet, see § 1-303.03.
Senior citizen motor vehicle accident prevention course certification, see § 50-2001 et seq.
Taxi stands, see § 1-301.71.
This section is referenced in § 1-636.02, § 9-1103.04, § 9-1111.15, § 34-731, § 47-2831, § 50-2201.22, § 50-2201.25, § 50-2201.27, § 50-2421.02, and § 50-2421.09.
1981 Ed., § 40-703.
1973 Ed., § 40-603.
D.C. Law 13-80 added par. (j)(3)(III).
Section 3 of D.C. Law 13-80 provided: “The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report, as revised and amended by the attached memorandum dated October 25, 1999, as the fiscal impact statement required by section 602(c)(3) of the Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Code § 1-233(c)(3)) [§ 1-206.02(c)(3), 2001 Ed.].”
Section 4 of D.C. Law 13-80 provided: “This act shall apply as of January 1, 2000.”
D.C. Law 14-213, in the section heading, substituted “Congressional and Council parking” for “Congressional parking”; in subsecs. (c) and (c)(1), substituted “Congress or the Council” for “Congress”; and in subsec. (c)(2), substituted “Congressional or Council” for “Congressional”.
D.C. Law 14-307, in subsec. (a)(4), substituted “$98” for “$75”; and in subsec. (d), substituted “$26 fee for each titling, duplicate titling, and retitling,” for “$20 fee for each titling and retitling,”.
D.C. Law 15-35, in subsec. (k), substituted “The notice, reclamation, and disposition procedures set forth in §§ 50-2421.06 through 50-2421.10, shall apply to any vehicle impounded pursuant to this section.” for “It shall be the duty of the officer or member of the police force or employee of the District of Columbia Department of Transportation, removing or immobilizing such motor vehicle, or under whose direction such vehicle is removed or immobilized, to inform as soon as practicable the owner of an impounded or immobilized vehicle of the nature and circumstances of the prior unsettled traffic violation notices, notices of infractions or warrants, for which or an account of which such vehicle was impounded or immobilized.” in the first sentence of par. (2), repealed par. (3), and deleted the second and third sentences in par. (4).
D.C. Law 15-239, in subsec. (f), substituted “otherwise provided in this part” for “provided”, and substituted “upon information or indictment” for “upon information”.
D.C. Law 15-307, in subsec. (j), rewrote par. (1) and added subpars. (J), (K), (L), and (M) in par. (3).
D.C. Law 16-33, in subsec. (k)(4), substituted “$75” for “$50”.
D.C. Law 16-129 rewrote subpar. (j)(3)(J), which had read as follows: “(J) A clean-fuel vehicle or electric vehicle determined by the United States Internal Revenue Service to be eligible for a federal tax deduction or credit pursuant to 26 U.S.C. §§ 30 and 179A for the tax year during which it is being titled.”
D.C. Law 16-139 added subpar. (j)(3)(N).
D.C. Law 16-191, in subsec. (j), validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 16-279, in subsec. (d), substituted “No registration or titling fee shall be charged for vehicles owned by the District government” for “No registration or other fee shall be charged to vehicles owned by the federal or District government or any duly accredited representative of a foreign government”; in subsec. (j)(3), substituted “Rental vehicles and utility trailers being registered as part of a rental fleet pursuant to subchapter III of Chapter 15 of this title” for “Rental vehicles and utility trailers, as defined in § 50-1505.01” in subpar. (F), and added subpars. (O), (P), and (Q); and added subsec. (l); and rewrote subsecs. (j)(1) and (k)(1), which formerly read:
“(j)(1) In addition to the fees and charges levied under other provisions of this part, there is hereby levied and imposed an excise tax on the issuance of every original certificate of title for a motor vehicle or trailer in the District of Columbia and, in the case of a sale, resale, gift or other transfer thereof, on the issuance of every subsequent certificate of title, except in the case of a bona fide gift between spouses, parent and child, or domestic partners, as that term is defined in § 32-701(3), at the following percentage of the fair market value of the motor vehicle or trailer at the time the certificate of title is issued:”
“(k)(1) Any unattended motor vehicle found parked at any time upon any public highway of the District of Columbia against which there are 2 or more outstanding or otherwise unsettled traffic violation notices or notices of infraction or against which there have been issued 2 or more warrants may, by or under the direction of an officer or member of the Metropolitan Police force or the United States Park Police force or an employee of the District of Columbia Department of Transportation, either by towing or otherwise, be removed or conveyed to and impounded in any place designated by the Mayor or immobilized in such manner as to prevent its operation; except, that no such vehicle shall be immobilized by any means other than by the use of a device or other mechanism which will cause no damage to such vehicle unless it is moved while such device or mechanism is in place.”
D.C. Law 17-219, in subsec. (j)(3), rewrote subpars. (F) and (J) and repealed subpar. (O.
D.C. Law 17-231, in subsec. (j)(3)(L), substituted “§ 32-702(d)(1)” for “§ 32-702”.
D.C. Law 17-303, in subsec. (k)(1), substituted “notices of infraction or vehicle conveyance fees” for “notices of infraction”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-266 substituted “$2,500” for “$1,000” in (d); substituted “$500” for “$300” in (f); substituted “a law enforcement officer” for “an officer” in (k)(1); substituted “law enforcement officer” for “officer” in (k)(2); made gender-neutral changes throughout the section; and made stylistic changes.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-272 rewrote (j)(1) and (j)(3)(H).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-290 substituted “motor-driven cycles” for “motorized bicycles” in (j)(3)(J).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $1,000 [$2,500]” in (d), and for “not more than $300 [$500]” in (f).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 substituted “registration tag or parking placard issued for the current session or by the District”’ for “registration tag issued by the jurisdiction represented by the member” in (c)(2); and added (k)(5).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Certificate of Title Excise Tax Exemption Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-312, April 8, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4701).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Low-Emissions Motor Vehicle Tax Exemption Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-88, April 4, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 3347).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 502 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794), § 502 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669), and § 502 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 502 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Motor Coach Vehicles Tax Exemption Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-182, November 22, 1999, 47 DCR 1).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1706(a) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1706(a) of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1706(a) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-103, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5499).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 13(b) of the Removal and Disposition of Abandoned, Dangerous and Other Unlawfully Parked Vehicles Reform Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 15-104, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5534).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 13(b) of Removal and Disposition of Abandoned and Other Unlawfully Parked Vehicles Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-171, October 6, 2003, 50 DCR 9163).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Certificate of Title Excise Tax Exemption Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-615, November 30, 2004, 51 DCR 11441).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Certificate of Title Excise Tax Exemption Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-20, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 2967).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6002 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Low-Emissions Motor Vehicle Tax Exemption Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-239, December 22, 2005, 53 DCR 258).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Low-Emissions Motor Vehicle Tax Exemption Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-324, March 23, 2006, 53 DCR 2574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 102(b) of Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-429, July 30, 2012, 59 DCR 9387).
For temporary amendment of (b), (d), (f), (j) and (k), see § 102(b) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-508, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12774).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 102(b) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 271(a) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 102(b) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 6012 and 6133 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 6012 and 6133 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short title of subtitle A of title VI of Law 16-33: Section 6001 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle A of title VI of the act may be cited as the Traffic Amendment Act of 2005.

Short title: Section 6005 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle B of title VI of the act may be cited as the “Department of Motor Vehicles Incentive Exemption for Leased Vehicles and Low Emission Vehicles Amendment Act of 2008”.

Section 6011 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle B of Title VI of the act may be cited as the “DMV Immobilization Amendment Act of 2013”.

Section 6131 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle N of Title VI of the act may be cited as the “Representation Tags Amendment Act of 2013”.

Delegation of authority under Law 5-14, see Mayor’s Order 83-190, July 25, 1983.

Section 5 of 46 Stat. 1429, ch. 317, effective Feb. 27, 1931, provided that all convictions under the Act shall be reported by the clerk of the court to the commissioners [Mayor] or their [his] designated agent.

Application of Law 15-35: Section 15 of D.C. Law 15-35 provided: “This act shall apply to all vehicles impounded after its effective date. This act shall also apply to all vehicles impounded prior to its effective date provided that notice is sent to the owners and lien holders in accordance with the provisions of subsections 7(b) or (c), as is applicable.”

Department of Vehicles and Traffic abolished: The Department of Vehicles and Traffic, including the Director, was abolished and the functions thereof transferred to the Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952. Reorganization Order No. 54 of the Board of Commissioners, dated June 30, 1953, as amended, September 1, 1953, established a Department of Vehicles and Traffic, headed by a Director; a Board of Revocation and Review of Hackers’ Identification Cards; a Motor Vehicle Parking Agency; and a Commissioners’ Traffic Advisory Board; prescribed the functions thereof; and abolished the previously existing Department of Vehicles and Traffic, the Registrar of Titles and Tags, the Board of Revocation and Review of Hackers’ Identification Cards, the Driver Improvement Section, and the Motor Vehicle Parking Agency. Reorganization Order No. 54 was repealed and replaced by Organization Order Nos. 105, 106, 107, and 108, dated May 17, 1955. Organization Order No. 105 continued the Department of Vehicles and Traffic and prescribed the functions thereof. Organization Order No. 106 continued the Motor Vehicle Parking Agency and prescribed the composition and functions thereof. The Department of Vehicles and Traffic was redesignated as the Department of Motor Vehicles by Commissioners’ Order No. 58-919, dated June 10, 1958. The Department of Highways was replaced by Reorganization Order No. 58-1116, dated July 15, 1958, which order established the Department of Highways and Traffic. The executive functions of the Board of Commissioners were transferred to the Commissioner of the District of Columbia by § 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967. Organization Order No. 107, relating to the Hackers’ Board was redesignated as Organization Order No. 13, dated August 15, 1968, and amended. Organization Order No. 108, as amended, replaced the Commissioners’ Traffic Advisory Board with a Citizens’ Traffic Board, and prescribed the composition and functions thereof. Reorganization Plan No. 2 of 1975 combined the Department of Motor Vehicles and the Department of Highways and Traffic to form the Department of Transportation.

The functions of the Department of Transportation were transferred to the Department of Public Works by Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1983, effective March 1, 1984.

Office of Assessor abolished: The Office of the Assessor was abolished and the functions thereof transferred to the Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952. All functions of the Office of the Assessor including the functions of all officers, employees and subordinate agencies were transferred to the Department of General Administration by Reorganization Order No. 3 of the Board of Commissioners, dated August 28, 1952. Reorganization Order No. 20, dated November 10, 1952, abolished the Office of the Assessor and transferred the functions to the Finance Office in the Department of General Administration. The same order provided that an Office of the Assessor would be created in the Finance Office. Reorganization Order No. 20 was superseded and replaced by Organization Order No. 121, dated December 12, 1957, provided that the Finance Office (consisting of the Office of the Finance Officers, Property Tax Division, Revenue Division, Treasury Division, Accounting Division, and Data Processing Division) shall continue under the direction and control of the Director of General Administration, and prescribed the functions thereof. The executive functions of the Board of Commissioners were transferred to the Commissioner of the District of Columbia by § 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967. Organization Order No. 121 was revoked by Organization Order No. 3, dated December 13, 1967, Part IVC of which prescribed the functions of the Finance Office within a newly established Department of General Administration. Functions of the Finance Office was stated in Part IVC of Organization Order No. 3 were transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Revenue by Commissioner’s Order No. 69-96, dated March 7, 1969. Functions pertaining to centralized accounting as set forth in Commissioner’s Order No. 69-96 were transferred to the Director of the Office of Budget and Financial Management by Organization Order No. 30, dated April 5, 1972. The Office of Budget and Financial Management was replaced by Organization Order No. 50, dated December 31, 1974, which Order established the Office of Budget and Management Systems. The Office of Budget and Management Systems was replaced by Mayor’s Order 79-5, dated January 2, 1979, which Order established the Office of Budget and Resource Development.

Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 1102 of D.C. Law 5-14 provided that the Mayor shall issue rules necessary to carry out the provisions of the act.

Effect of repeal provisions: Section 14 of D.C. Law 15-35 provided: “Any repeal of a law or regulation by this act shall not invalidate any enforcement action, adjudication, or any other action made or taken pursuant to such law or regulation.”

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402 (295 to 299) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.